Arkansas, session 2025, SB536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of Arkansas State Library.
(a)(1) The Arkansas State Library is abolished, and its authority,
functions, records, contracts, personnel, and unexpended balances of
appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of
budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Education.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this act, the duties and
property of the Arkansas State Library are transferred to the Department of
Education.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this act, the Arkansas State
Library's statutory powers, duties, and functions, including the functions of
budgeting or purchasing, records, contracts, personnel, property, and
unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds are
transferred to the Department of Education.
*LGL163*
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
(c)(1) The abolishment of the Arkansas State Library does not affect
the orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or standards made or
promulgated by the Arkansas State Library before the effective date of this
act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or
standards of the Arkansas State Library shall continue to be in effect until
they are amended or repealed under authority given by law.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of State Library Board.
(a) The State Library Board is abolished, and its authority, duties,
functions, records, contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances
of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of
budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Education.
(b) The State Library Board's statutory powers, duties, and functions,
including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, records, contracts,
personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations,
and other funds are transferred to the Department of Education.
(c)(1) The abolishment of the State Library Board does not affect the
orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or standards made or
promulgated by the State Library Board before the effective date of this act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, and
standards of the State Library Board shall continue to be in effect until
they are amended or repealed by the Department of Education.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-47-302(d), concerning the implementation
of courses offered in elementary and secondary schools, is amended to read
follows:
(d) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall work with
the Arkansas School for Mathematics, Sciences, and the Arts, the Educational
Television Division, the education service cooperatives, the Arkansas State
Library, and other state agencies involved in distance learning.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 13-2-103(c), concerning the Arkansas State
Library, is amended to read as follows:
(c) Copies of the standards and rules for the enforcement of this
section shall be submitted to the Arkansas State Library Archives.
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 13-2-201 is repealed.
13-2-201. State and local publications defined — Exemptions.
(a) As used in this subchapter, the terms “state publication” and
“local publication” shall include any document issued or printed by any state
agency or local government which may be released for distribution, but these
terms do not include:
(1) The bound volumes of the printed acts of each of the
sessions of the General Assembly;
(2) The bound volumes of the Arkansas Supreme Court Reports;
(3) Printed copies of the Arkansas Statutes of 1947 Annotated or
pocket part supplements thereto;
(4) Any other printed document which may be obtained from the
office of the Secretary of State upon the payment of a charge or fee
therefor;
(5) Correspondence and intraoffice or interoffice or agency
communications or documents which are not of vital interest to the public;
(6)(A) Publications of state or local agencies intended or
designed to be of limited distribution to meet the requirements of
educational, cultural, scientific, professional, or similar use of a limited
or restricted purpose and which are not designed for general distribution.
(B) Similarly, other publications or printed documents
which are prepared to meet the limited distribution requirements of a
governmental grant or use which are not intended for general distribution
shall also be deemed exempt from the provisions of this subchapter unless
funds have been provided for printing of a quantity of such publications
sufficient for distribution.
(b) A depository copy of each document noted in subdivisions (a)(1),
(2), (3), and (6) shall be made available to the Arkansas State Library.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code §§ 13-2-203 - 13-2-209 are repealed.
13-2-203. Arkansas State Library created.
(a) There is created and established within the Department of
Education a division to be known as the Arkansas State Library.
(b) The library shall function within the Department of Education in
the same manner as provided by agencies transferred pursuant to a cabinet-
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
level transfer under § 25-43-105 and which shall be adequately funded and
properly housed in a designated building at the seat of state government.

13-2-204. State Librarian.
(a) The Arkansas State Library shall be headed by the State Librarian,
to be appointed by the State Library Board, in consultation with the
Secretary of the Department of Education. The State Librarian shall serve for
such time and for such terms as the board may prescribe.
(b) The State Librarian shall be a person of good professional
standing and reputation, holding at least a master's degree from a graduate
school of library science accredited by the American Library Association, and
shall have had experience in library administration in academic, public,
school, or special libraries.
(c) The State Librarian shall have charge of the work of the library
and shall perform such other duties as the board may prescribe.

13-2-205. State Library Board.
(a) There is created the State Library Board.
(b)(1) The board shall consist of seven (7) members, to be appointed
by the Governor subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(2) The members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor
for reasons of their interest in libraries and in statewide library
development.
(3)(A) One (1) member of the board shall be appointed from each
of the four (4) congressional districts of this state in existence at the
time of appointment, and three (3) members shall be selected from the state
at large.
(B) However, no more than two (2) members of the board
shall be appointed from any one (1) congressional district.
(4)(A) All members appointed to the board shall serve terms of
seven (7) years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.
(B) No board member shall be appointed to serve for more
than two (2) consecutive full terms.
(c) Vacancies occurring on the board due to death, resignation, or
other reason shall be filled by appointment of the Governor for the remainder
of the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as for the initial
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
appointment.
(d)(1) Members of the board shall receive per diem at the rate
established by law for attending board meetings or for performing other
services required of members in their official capacity as members of the
board.
(2) In addition, members shall be entitled to mileage at the
rate provided by law for official travel of state employees for each mile in
traveling from their place of residence to meetings of the board and
returning or for attending to other authorized business of the board.

13-2-206. Meetings of board.
(a) The State Library Board shall meet at such place or places and
shall keep such records as it may deem appropriate.
(b) The board shall select annually a chair and any other officers as
it deems necessary.
(c) The board shall adopt policies and bylaws governing its meetings,
the conduct of its business, and the business of the Arkansas State Library.
(d) The State Librarian shall serve as secretary of the board, but
without a vote thereon, and shall attend all of the board meetings and keep
records thereof.
(e) A majority of the board's members shall constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business, and all business transacted by the board shall
be by majority vote of its members.

13-2-207. Powers and duties generally.
Within the limitations of facilities and funds provided for the
Arkansas State Library, the Arkansas State Library shall:
(1) Acquire books and other library materials by purchase,
exchange, gift, grant, or donation and catalog and maintain those books and
materials and make them available for reference and research use of the
public and the public officials and employees of this state and its political
subdivisions under such rules established by the State Library Board as may
be reasonably necessary to govern the use and preservation thereof;
(2) Establish and maintain a collection of books and library
materials of and pertaining to Arkansas and its people, resources, and
history and maintain the collection as a separate section within the Arkansas
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
State Library;
(3) Operate and maintain a collection of multimedia materials to
complement book collections and establish reasonable rules for their use and
preservation;
(4) Provide specialized services to the blind and individuals
with physical disabilities under a cooperative plan with the National Library
Service for the Blind and Physically Handicapped of the Library of Congress;
(5) Assist communities, libraries, schools, colleges,
universities, study and civic clubs and groups, charitable and penal
institutions, state agencies and departments, county and municipal
governments, and any other institutions, agencies, and individuals with
books, information, library materials, and services as needed;
(6) Direct the establishment and development of county and
regional library systems and programs, devise and implement a certification
plan for public librarians, and assist in the design and building of public
library facilities;
(7) Conduct courses of library instruction, hold library
institutes in various parts of the state, and encourage the recruitment and
training of library personnel in any suitable manner;
(8) Cooperate with the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education and the Division of Higher Education in devising plans for the
development of libraries, in aiding librarians in their administration, in
certification policies, and in formulating rules for the use of libraries;
(9) Receive gifts of library materials, money, and real and
personal property, to be held in trust, subject to the terms of the donation
for the purposes of this subchapter;
(10) Be the official state library agency designated to
administer state and federal programs of aid to libraries and to undertake
such other activities and services as will further statewide development of
libraries and library systems through interlibrary, interagency, and
interstate cooperation in order to secure efficient and effective library
service for all Arkansans;
(11)(A) Cooperate with the various officers, departments,
and agencies of state government in pooling and sharing library materials and
programs so that duplication of services and facilities shall be minimized
and so that maximum utilization may be made of the library services and
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
resources of this state.
(B) In furtherance of subdivision (11)(A) of this section,
the Arkansas State Library may enter into contracts or agreements with state
officers, departments, and agencies for the provision of special library
services where needed and, under the terms of the contract or agreement, may
provide for the method of financing special costs incurred by the Arkansas
State Library in furnishing and maintaining such special library services;
and
(12) Perform all other functions and services that are common to
the purposes and objectives of a state library.

13-2-208. Cooperation with other libraries.
(a) The Arkansas State Library shall cooperate with the public and
private libraries in the State of Arkansas and may enter into necessary
agreements with libraries in other states and the Library of Congress for the
sharing of library books, documents, facilities, or services under such terms
and conditions as the State Library Board shall determine to be within the
scope and services of the Arkansas State Library and in keeping with the
state's library programs.
(b)(1) The Arkansas State Library shall obtain reports from all
libraries and each year report the condition, growth, development, and manner
of development of those libraries and such other facts and statistics as may
be of public interest.
(2) The Arkansas State Library shall include a summary thereof
in its biennial report, which shall be filed with the Governor and the
presiding officer of each house of the General Assembly.

13-2-209. Agreements with Arkansas State Archives and Secretary of
State.
(a) The Arkansas State Library, acting through the State Library
Board, is authorized to enter into necessary agreements with the Arkansas
State Archives, with respect to an overall plan and design to assure that the
functions and materials of the library and the Arkansas State Archives may be
convenient to the public and public officials of this state and to its
political subdivisions, and to assure that unnecessary duplication of
services and facilities is minimized.
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
(b)(1)(A) In addition, the library is authorized to enter into
contracts and agreements with the Secretary of State for the custody,
storage, cataloging, or display in the library or Arkansas State Archives of
any books, records, documents, or other papers in the custody of the
Secretary of State.
(B) This shall be done under such terms and conditions as
may be mutually agreed to by the parties.
(2) The library is also authorized to accept custody and control
over any books, records, and documents which the Secretary of State is now
required by law to keep or maintain in his or her official files or volumes,
if:
(A) The Secretary of State shall determine that the
records could be properly cataloged, stored, and preserved in the library or
Arkansas State Archives; and
(B) The Governor agrees in writing for the transfer of the
books, records, and documents from the Secretary of State to the library or
Arkansas State Archives, in accordance with the terms of the agreement made
in writing signed by the Secretary of State and the State Librarian or the
State Historian for the custody, cataloging, preservation, and care of the
records.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 13-2-210 is amended to read as follows:
13-2-210. Depository for federal, state, and local documents.
(a) The Arkansas State Library shall serve as the state's regional
depository library for federal documents and shall become the official
depository for state and local documents The Department of Education shall
cause any property held by the former Arkansas State Library under the
federal Depository Library Program to be transferred or disposed of in a
manner consistent with 44 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq., as it existed on January 1,
2025.
(b) The Department of Education may transfer assets held pursuant to
the federal Depository Library Program to any library eligible to receive the
assets in question subject to the requirements of federal law.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 13-2-211 is repealed.
13-2-211. Depository agreements and eligibility.
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
(a) The Arkansas State Library may enter into depository agreements
with any city, county, district, regional, town, school, college, or
university library in this state.
(b) The Arkansas State Library shall establish standards for
eligibility as a depository library under this section, § 13-2-210, and §§
13-2-212 — 13-2-214. The standards may include and take into account:
(1) The type of library;
(2) The library's ability to preserve state and local
publications and to make them available for public use; and
(3) The library's geographical location, in order to assure that
the publications are conveniently accessible to residents in all areas of the
state.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 13-2-212 is amended to read as follows:
13-2-212. State and Local Government Publications Clearinghouse.
(a) The Arkansas State Library shall create and maintain a State and
Local Government Publications Clearinghouse The Department of Education shall
cause any property held by the Arkansas State Library under the State and
Local Government Publications Clearinghouse Program to be transferred to the
Arkansas State Archives.
(b) The Arkansas State Library shall make such rules as may be
necessary to carry out the purposes of the clearinghouse.
(c)(1) All state agencies, including the General Assembly and
its committees, constitutional officers, any department, division, bureau,
board, commission, or agency of the State of Arkansas, all local governments,
including cities of the first and second class and incorporated towns, and
counties, and all boards, commissions, or agencies thereof shall furnish to
the Arkansas State Library, upon release, a specified number of copies of
each of its state or local publications.
(2) These publications shall be furnished to enable the
clearinghouse to meet the needs of the Depository Library System and to
provide library loan services to those libraries without depository status.
(3) The distribution will be required only if sufficient funds
are appropriated for the printing of these materials by the agencies, boards,
and commissions and for the distribution thereof by the Arkansas State
Library to depository libraries.
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
(d) At least quarterly, and more frequently if funds are available,
the clearinghouse of the Arkansas State Library shall publish and, upon
request, distribute a list of state publications to all state agencies and
contracting depository libraries.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code §§ 13-2-213 and 13-2-214 are repealed.
13-2-213. Number of copies provided clearinghouse.
(a) If sufficient funds are available, each state and local agency
printing or duplicating publications of the type which are to be made
available to the State and Local Government Publications Clearinghouse shall
print or duplicate fifty (50) additional copies or a lesser number as may be
requested by the Arkansas State Library, for deposit with the clearinghouse
for distribution to established depository libraries or interstate library
exchange.
(b) However, if a state agency or a local governmental agency does not
have sufficient funds or resources available to furnish the fifty (50) copies
to the clearinghouse, it shall notify the Arkansas State Library and deliver
to the clearinghouse three (3) copies of each publication to be maintained in
the Arkansas State Library, to be indexed and made available on loan to
participating libraries through the interlibrary loan services of the
Arkansas State Library.

13-2-214. Libraries of colleges and universities — Contracts — Status.
(a) The Arkansas State Library is authorized to enter into contracts
or agreements with the Mullins Library of the University of Arkansas at
Fayetteville and the library of each of the state-supported institutions of
higher learning in this state to provide through the State and Local
Government Publications Clearinghouse any of the clearinghouse, exchange,
depository, or selective or partial depository duties or functions of any of
the libraries, or to provide depository library services in behalf of any of
the libraries that may be mutually agreed to by the Arkansas State Library
and the Mullins Library of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville or one
(1) of the several institutions of higher learning of this state.
(b)(1) Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to repeal, amend,
modify, or affect the status of the Mullins Library of the University of
Arkansas at Fayetteville as a depository of state, city, and county documents
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
under the provisions of §§ 25-18-301 — 25-18-304.
(2) This subchapter shall not repeal, amend, modify, or affect
the powers of the Mullins Library of the University of Arkansas at
Fayetteville or the library of each of the state-supported institutions of
higher learning to be a selective or partial depository of state, city, and
county documents under the provisions of §§ 25-18-306 — 25-18-308.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 13-2-509, concerning the Arkansas State
Archives, is amended as follows:
(c) A copy of this report shall be filed with the State Library Board
Arkansas State Archives.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 13-2-601 is amended to read as follows:
13-2-601. Definition.
As used in this compact, “state library agency”, with reference to this
state, means the State Library Board a library in the state designated by the
Secretary of the Department of Education.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 13-2-605 is amended to read as follows:
13-2-605. Prerequisites for construction or maintenance of libraries.
No county, city, town, or combination thereof acting as a regional
library district of this state shall be party to a library agreement which
provides for the construction or maintenance of a library pursuant to Article
III, subdivision (c)7 of the compact, nor pledge its credit in support of
such a library, or contribute to the capital financing thereof, except:
(1) After after compliance with the Arkansas Constitution and
any laws applicable to the county, city, town, or combination thereof
relating to or governing capital outlays and the pledging of credit; and
(2) After submitting the plan to the State Library Board for
approval.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 13-2-903(d) and (e), concerning the
creation of a regional library system, are amended as follows:
(d)(1) The ordinance shall be signed by the mayor of each municipality
and the county judge of each county, attested by the respective clerks, and
sent to the Secretary of State and to the Arkansas State Library. The
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
Secretary of State shall receive and file it and shall record it in an
appropriate book of record in his or her office.
(2) When the ordinance has been made, filed, and recorded as
provided in this subchapter, the system shall constitute a public body and a
body corporate and politic under the name proposed in the ordinance.
(e)(1) Any ordinance filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to the
provisions of this section may be amended from time to time, and any other
municipality or county may become a new member in the system with the consent
of the members of the system evidenced by ordinances of their governing
bodies.
(2) The amendment shall be signed and filed with the Secretary
of State and Arkansas State Library Archives in the manner provided in this
section.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 13-2-1002(a), concerning the creation of
the Arkansas Digital Library, is amended as follows:
(a)(1) The Division of Higher Education and the Arkansas State Library
Archives shall develop a digitized maintain a digital collection of
information that includes information that is in the public domain, cleared
for public distribution over the internet, and to which students of public
postsecondary schools in Arkansas have access.
(2) The digitized information digital collection under this
subchapter shall be available for public access in at least one (1) location
in each Arkansas county.

SECTION 16. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 13-2-
1002(b)(1), concerning the creation of the Arkansas Digital Library, is
amended as follows:
(b)(1) The division and the library Arkansas State Archives shall
develop criteria regarding the:

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code Title 13, Chapter 2, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

SUBCHAPTER 11 — Department of Education Duties

03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
13-2-1101. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Age-inappropriate material” means books, media, or any
other material accessible at a public library containing images or explicit
and detailed descriptions of:
(i) Sexual acts as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2246, as
it existed on January 1, 2025;
(ii) Sexual contact as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2246,
as it existed on January 1, 2025; or
(iii) Human genitalia.
(B) “Age-inappropriate material” does not include:
(i) Educational material with information concerning
the biology or anatomy of the human body; or
(ii) Sex education material that is accessible to
age-appropriate persons as provided in this subchapter;
(2) “Director of record” means a person who:
(i) Is a resident of the state;
(ii) Satisfies the requirements of § 13-2-
1104(b)(3)(A)(i) or § 13-2-1104(b)(3)(A)(ii); and
(iii) Has a contract with a public library to
perform certain duties for the public library, including without limitation
the duty to:
(a) Attend all meetings of the governing board
of the public library;
(b) Participate in the hiring of all
professional and paraprofessional staff of the public library; and
(c) Hold weekly meetings with the director of
the public library to ensure the the operations, practices, and policies of
the public library meet professional standards;
(3) “Public library” means:
(A) A county library organized under § 13-2-401 et seq.;
(B) A municipal library organized under § 13-2-501 et
seq.;
(C) A regional library organized under § 13-2-501 et seq.;
(D) A library system composed of county and municipal
libraries operating under an interlocal agreement under § 14-14-910 and § 25-
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
20-101 et seq.; and
(E) A library system organized and operated as a public
body corporate and politic under § 25-20-201 et seq;
(4) “Sex education material” means age-appropriate information
designed to prepare minors for the sociology of puberty;
(5) “State aid” means a funding program administered by the
Department of Education that is designed to provide supplemental financial
assistance to a public library, subject to the requirements of this
subchapter;
(6) “State library administrative agency” means the official
agency of the state charged by the law of the state with the extension and
development of public library services throughout the state;
(7) “State Plan” means the document that includes without
limitation:
(A) An assurance that the state library administrative
agency has the fiscal and legal authority to administer all aspects of this
subchapter;
(B) An assurance of the establishment of the state's
policies, priorities, criteria, and procedures necessary for the
implementation of all programs under this subchapter;
(C) Confirmation that copies shall be submitted for
approval as required by rules promulgated by the director;
(D) Identification of the library needs of the state; and
(E) The activities to be taken to meet the identified
needs of the state under subdivision (7)(D) of this section that are
supported by the federal aid made available under this subchapter.

13-2-1102. Department of Education — Powers and duties.
(a) The Department of Education may:
(1) Administer state aid to a public library as provided under
this subchapter;
(2) Administer federal aid to a public library;
(3) Provide specialized services to the individuals who are
blind and individuals with physical disabilities under a cooperative plan
with the National Library Service for the Blind and Physically Handicapped of
the Library of Congress;
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
(4) Assist in the establishment and development of county
library systems and programs and regional library systems and programs;
(5) Devise and implement a certification plan for public library
librarians;
(6) Assist in the design and building of public library
facilities;
(7) Conduct educational programs to develop or improve the
services of a public library, including without limitation:
(A) Courses on library instruction; and
(B) Regional library leadership institutes providing
professional development for employees of public libraries;
(8) Prepare and submit a written state plan to the Director of
the Institute of Museum and Library Services required under 20 U.S.C. § 9134,
as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(9) Take steps to fulfill the actions under 20 U.S.C. § 9141, as
it existed on January 1, 2025, to utilize federal grant funds to improve
library services for state residents; and
(10) Cooperate with the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education and the Division of Higher Education to:
(A) Devise a plan for the development of a public library;
and
(B) Aid public library librarians in their administration
of a public library, the creation of certification policies, and the creation
of rules for the use of a public library.
(b) The Department of Education may perform other functions and
services to fulfill the purposes and objectives of this subchapter.

13-2-1103. Department of Education — Rules.
(a) The Department of Education may promulgate any necessary rules for
the department to fulfill its obligations under this subchapter consistent
with the requirements of the Arkansas Administrative Procedures Act, § 25-15-
201 et seq.
(b) Except as provided under § 13-2-212, rules promulgated by the
State Library Board that are in effect at the time this subchapter is enacted
shall be the rules of the department.

03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
13-2-1104. State aid – Criteria.
(a) The Department of Education shall administer a program to
distribute funds appropriated by the General Assembly as state aid to a
public library that meets the criteria under subsection (b) of this section.
(b) State aid shall be made available to a public library that
satisfies all of the following requirements:
(1) The governing body of the public library shall:
(A) Hold six (6) or more regularly scheduled meetings each
calendar year;
(B) Conduct business in accordance with established bylaws
filed with the Office of Library and Information Services of the Department
of Education;
(C) Adopt and enforce policies that:
(i) Govern the development of the collection of
materials and resources of the public library;
(ii) Prohibit access to age-inappropriate materials
to a person who is sixteen (16) years old or younger;
(iii)(a) Except as provided under subdivision
(b)(1)(C)(iii)(b) of this section, grants access to sex education materials.
(b) Sex education materials shall not be
accessed by a minor person who is eleven (11) years old or younger and whose
parent or guardian has informed the public library in writing that the minor
person is not authorized to access sex-education materials;
(iv)(a) Provide a process for a member of the public
to request the inclusion, removal, or a policy regarding access to age-
inappropriate or sex education materials and resources.
(b) A policy requested under subdivision
(b)(1)(C)(iv)(a) of this section shall:
(1) Comply with all other requirements
of state law; and
(2) Include an appeal of any initial
staff determination to the governing body;
(v) Govern unattended children in a public library;
and
(vi) Govern library computer use under § 13-2-103;
and
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
(D) Attend a board orientation program provided by the
Department of Education within six (6) months of the beginning of his or her
term of office;
(2)(A) Demonstrate the availability of funds for the public
library equal to:
(i) The current operations budget of the public
library for one year; or
(ii) An amount equal to the revenue that one (1)
mill of the tax levied for the benefit of the public library would have
generated in the prior tax year.
(B) The availability of funds under subdivision (b)(2)(A)
of this section shall be prepared and submitted to the department in writing;
(3)(A) The director of the public library shall have at least
one (1) of the following qualifications:
(i) A master’s degree in Library Science from an
institution accredited by an agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education or Council for Higher Education Accreditation;
(ii)(a) A bachelor’s degree or a graduate degree in
a related field to library science from an institution accredited by an
agency recognized by the United States Department of Education or Council for
Higher Education Accreditation.
(b) A director of a public library who
satisfies the requirement under subdivision (b)(3)(A)(ii)(a) of this section
shall also possess the following:
(1) Three (3) years or more of
experience in public library administration;
(2) Twelve (12) hours or more of
postsecondary courses in the following subject matters:
(A) Collection Development;
(B) Personnel Management;
(C) Library Technology; and
(D) Financial Management; or
(3) Completion of a training program
approved or conducted by the Department of Education that includes
professional training related to the successful operation of public libraries
in Arkansas; or
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
(iii) The public library contracts with a resident
who is a director of record for three (3) years or less to supervise the
operations of the library while either:
(a) The director of record is actively
pursuing the minimum qualifications to be a qualified library director under
subdivision (b)(3)(A)(i) or subdivision (b)(3)(A)(ii) of this section; or
(b) The governing board of the public library
is engaged in an active and sustained search for a qualified full-time
library director.
(B) A public library under subdivision (b)(3)(A)(iii) that
contracts with a resident who is a director of record for more than three (3)
consecutive years shall not receive state aid until the public library
employs a director satisfying the requirements under subdivision (b)(3)(A)(i)
or subdivision (b)(3)(A)(ii) of this section;
(4)(A) The public library shall provide suitable facilities that
are open to the public during services hours.
(B) The service hours shall be posted, advertised, and
satisfy the following minimum hour requirements:
(i) For a service population of less than ten
thousand (10,000) people, the minimum service hours per year is one thousand
four hundred and eighty (1,480) hours;
(ii) For a service population of ten thousand
(10,000) people or more and nineteen thousand (19,000) people or less, the
minimum service hours per year is one thousand seven hundred and thirty
(1,730) hours;
(iii) For a service population of nineteen thousand
and one (19,001) people or more and forty-nine thousand (49,000) people or
less, the minimum service hours per year is one thousand nine hundred and
eighty (1,980) hours; or
(iv) For a service population of more than forty-
nine thousand (49,000) people, the minimum service hours per year is two
thousand four hundred and seventy (2,470) hours.
(C) A public library operating in multiple counties shall
satisfy the minimum service hour requirements separately in each county where
the public library operates;
(5)(A) The public library shall maintain a current collection of
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
materials that:
(i) Provides quality resources for residents of the
state based on the needs of the community; and
(ii) Complies with the requirements of Arkansas law.
(B) The collection under subdivision (b)(5)(A) of this
section shall not include any materials described under § 5-68-501(2);
(6) The public library shall agree to provide an interlibrary
loan service to other public libraries in the state; and
(7) The public library shall coordinate services for individuals
who are blind or individuals who are physically handicapped with the entities
that administer these services.

13-2-1105. Public library — Reporting requirements.
(a) To be considered for state aid under this subchapter, a public
library shall prepare and submit a written report annually to the Department
of Education including without limitation:
(1) Documentation that the public library qualifies as a public
library under § 13-2-1101;
(2) All current bylaws and policies approved by the governing
board of the public library;
(3) The Annual Public Library Survey;
(4) A current long-range plan developed for the purpose of
guiding the public library administration in the attainment of goals and
future planning and approved by the governing board of the public library;
(5) Information and documentation necessary to determine the
qualifications of the library director of the public library;
(6) The name and contact information of the library director;
(7) The name and contact information of the members of the
governing board of the public library;
(8)(A) An assurance of compliance with the applicable laws of
the state, rules promulgated by the department, and the policies of the
public library.
(B) An assurance under subdivision (a)(8)(A) of this
section shall be signed by the library director and the library board chair;
and
(9) Any other report or information requested in writing by the
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
Department of Education.
(b) A public library receiving state aid under this subchapter shall
notify the department no less than thirty (30) days following a change of the
following positions:
(1) The director of the public library; or
(2) The board chair of the public library.

13-2-1106. Determination of eligibility – Appeals.
(a) The Department of Education shall determine whether a public
library qualifies for state aid under the provisions of this subchapter.
(b)(1) The department shall provide written notice of a determination
under subsection (a) of this section to the director of each public library
on or before March 30 preceding the fiscal year the determination concerns.
(2) If the department determines that a public library does not
qualify for state aid, the notice shall document the basis for the
determination.
(c) A determination under subsection (a) of this section shall include
the qualification of a public library for funding under any incentive program
established by the department.
(d)(1) A public library may submit a written appeal of a determination
under subsection (a) of this section to the Secretary of the Department of
Education on or before April 31 preceding the fiscal year the determination
concerns.
(2) An appeal under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall
provide information demonstrating:
(A) The determination was made in error; or
(B) The determination was correct but remedial actions
have been taken by the public library to bring the public library into
compliance with the requirements of this subchapter.
(3) The secretary shall consider all available information to
make a final determination prior to the first day of the fiscal year when
state aid will be distributed to all qualifying public libraries.
(e)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section,
a determination under subsection (a) of this section shall remain in effect
for one fiscal year.
(2)(A) A determination under subsection (a) of this section may
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
be reevaluated by the department if the department receives credible
information indicating that a public library is no longer in compliance with
the requirements under § 13-2-1104(b).
(B) The department may request information necessary to
complete a reevaluation of a public library under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of
this section.
(C)(i) If the department determines that the public
library is no longer eligible to receive state aid under subdivision
(e)(2)(A) of this section, the director shall prepare and submit a written
notice to the public library that including the basis for the reevaluation
determination.
(ii) A public library may submit a written appeal of
a determination under subdivision (e)(2)(C)(i) to the secretary within thirty
(30) days of the transmission date of the determination to the director of
the public library.
(iii) The secretary shall consider all available
information and make a final determination of the eligibility of the public
library to receive state aid.
(iv) The public library shall continue to receive
state aid until the latter date of:
(a) Thirty (30) days following the
determination of the secretary under subdivision (e)(2)(C)(i) of this
section; or
(b) The secretary transmits a final
determination to the public library.

13-2-1107. Establishment of funding formula for state aid.
(a) State aid shall be distributed under this subchapter according to
a formula created by rule as promulgated by the Department of Education.
(b) A rule promulgated under subsection (a) of this section shall
ensure that:
(1) Each qualifying public library receives the same base
allocation of state aid;
(2)(A) Except as provided under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this
section, the department may establish an incentive program to improve a
public library that is:
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
(i) Based on the policy goals of the department; and
(ii) Is consistent with the public policy of the
state.
(B) An incentive program under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of
this section shall:
(i) Not exceed ten (10%) percent of the total
appropriation for state aid in the fiscal year in which the aid is
distributed; and
(ii) Includes objective criteria for the
qualification of a public library to receive the aid of the incentive
program;
(3)(A) All other funds appropriated for state aid are
distributed based on the population of the political boundary that the public
library serves.
(B) The population under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this
section shall be determined by the most recent federal decennial census;
(4) When two (2) qualifying public libraries serve the same
population, that population is allocated state aid as follows:
(A) The population served by two (2) public libraries is
allocated state aid only for the public library with a political boundary
that is located within the political boundary of another qualifying public
library; or
(B) The population served by two (2) public libraries is
allocated state aid only for the smaller public library of the population in
which the other public library has a political boundary that extends beyond
the political boundary of the smaller public library; and
(5) Any other provision is included to ensure the state aid
formula is fair and includes clearly established and objective parameters for
the distribution of funds to a public library by the department.
(c) From July 1, 2025 until June 30, 2026, the department may
distribute available state aid funds in a manner consistent with the
practices of the former Arkansas State Library until the rules required under
subsection (a) of this section are promulgated by the department.

13-2-1108. Department of Education — Designation as state
administrative agency.
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
The Department of Education shall be designated as the state library
administrative agency for the purpose of 20 U.S.C. § 1921 et seq., as it
existed on January 1, 2025.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 13-3-104(a), concerning the powers and
duties of the Arkansas State Archives, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(9) Maintain the State and Local Government Publications
Clearinghouse Program.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code Title 13, Chapter 3, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
13-3-110. State and Local Government Publications Clearinghouse.
(a)(1) The State and Local Government Publications Clearinghouse
program is transferred from the Arkansas State Library to the Arkansas State
Archives.
(2) All publications, records, software, contracts, or other
property associated with the program shall be held by the Arkansas State
Archives.
(b) The Arkansas State Archives may promulgate rules to carry out the
purposes of the clearinghouse.
(c) Any state agency, constitutional officer, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or agency of the state, any local government,
including cities of the first class and cities of the second class and
incorporated towns, counties, and all boards, commissions, or agencies, and
the General Assembly, including without limitation a committee of the General
Assembly, shall furnish to the Arkansas State Archives:
(1) A number of copies specified by the Arkansas State Archives
of each of its state or local publications; and
(2) A digital copy of the state or local publication.
(d) Once per quarter or more, the clearinghouse of the Arkansas State
Archives shall publish a list of state publications available to all state
agencies.
(e)(1) The Arkansas State Archives shall maintain an online database
of all digitally formatted state or local publications it receives under
subdivision (c) of this section.
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
(2) The Arkansas State Archives may include in its online
database under subdivision (e)(1) of this section any state or local
publication that the Arkansas State Archives has converted to a digital
format.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 13-13-102(c)(4)(E), concerning the members
of the Arkansas Civil War Sesquicentennial Commission, is amended to read as
follows:
(E) Director of the Arkansas State Library Secretary of the
Department of Education;

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 19-4-906(054), concerning motor vehicle
authorizations, is repealed.
(054) Arkansas State Library 29

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 19-4-906(075), concerning motor vehicle
authorizations, is amended to read as follows:
(075) Department of Education 10
20

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 19-5-305(a), concerning the Public School
Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Public School Fund shall consist of the following fund
accounts and funds made available for the support of the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education, the Arkansas State Library Department of
Education, and the Division of Career and Technical Education and shall be
used for the same purposes as set out for the following fund accounts:
(1) Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public School
Fund Account. The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public
School Fund Account shall be used for grants and aids for the programs
administered by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education as
authorized by law;
(2) Division of Career and Technical Education Public School Fund
Account. The Division of Career and Technical Education Public School Fund
Account shall be used for grants and aids for the programs administered by
the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Adult Education Section,
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
and the Office of Skills Development, consisting of, but not limited to:
(A) General adult education grants;
(B) Adult basic education grants;
(C) Manpower development and training grants;
(D) Vocational-technical and adult education; and
(E) Such other grants and aids as may be authorized by law
for disbursement by the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Adult
Education Section, and the Office of Skills Development; and
(3) State Library Public School Fund Account. The State Library
Public School Fund Account shall be used for State Aid to Public Libraries as
administered by the Arkansas State Library department.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 21-7-402(b) and (c), concerning the
publication of annual and biennial reports, are amended to read as follows:
(b) Fifty (50) copies shall be filed with the Arkansas State Library,
Arkansas State Archives pursuant to § 13-3-110 and twenty (20) copies shall
be filed with the Mullins Library David W. Mullins Library of the University
of Arkansas at Fayetteville, as required by law, for distribution purposes.
(c) The publication and filing of such reports in the manner provided
in this section shall constitute sufficient distribution, in lieu of other
distribution requirements which may be prescribed by law, provided:
(1) A record or list of reports available at the Arkansas State
Library Archives shall be distributed every three (3) months to the
appropriate parties, including members of the General Assembly or other
public officials who may be designated by law to receive copies thereof. The
furnishing of the lists or record shall meet the formalities of any statutory
requirements specifying which officials shall receive copies of the reports;
and
(2) Copies of the reports shall be made available to the maximum
extent practicable, upon request therefor, but the Arkansas State Library
Archives may provide, by rules, for recovery of the costs of reproduction.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 25-11-203 is amended to read as follows:
25-11-203. Exemption.
No provision of this subchapter shall apply to any program or service
currently operated or administered by the Arkansas School for the Blind or
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
the State Library Board Department of Education, and this subchapter shall
not amend or repeal any statutory provision governing the operation of the
Arkansas School for the Blind or the Arkansas State Library Department of
Education.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 25-15-204(e)(1), concerning the procedure
for the adoption of rules under the Administrative Procedure Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(e)(1)(A) An agency shall file with the Secretary of State and the
Legislative Council a:
(i) Copy of each rule, including without limitation an
emergency rule, proposed by the agency;
(ii) Financial impact statement for the proposed rule;
(iii) Notice for the adoption, amendment, or repeal of
any rule required to be published on the internet under this section;
(iv) Statement setting forth the reason for the
proposed rule; and
(v) Summary of the proposed rule.
(B) An agency shall file with the Arkansas State Library a copy
of each rule, including without limitation an emergency rule, finalized by
the agency and a financial impact statement for the rule.
(C)(B) A rule shall be filed in compliance with this section and
with §§ 10-3-309 and 25-15-218.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(21), concerning stipend
authorizations for certain boards and commissions, is repealed.
(21) State Library Board;

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 25-18-306(b) and (c), concerning selective
and partial depositories of public records, are amended to read as follows:
(b) Each department or division of the state, city, and county which
is directed to furnish copies of publications to the David W. Mullins Library
of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville is authorized and directed to
send to the Arkansas State Library Archives a list of all publications
published by the department or division during the preceding quarter.
(c) The Arkansas State Library Archives shall prepare a checklist of
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
all publications published by all counties, cities, departments, and agencies
of this state and shall furnish quarterly a copy of the checklist to each of
the institutions of higher learning in this state.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 25-18-307 is amended to read as follows:
25-18-307. Procedure to obtain state and local publications.
(a) Any institution of higher learning desiring to obtain copies of
any publication contained in the checklist shall order the number of copies,
not to exceed three (3) copies of any one (1) report or publication, desired
from the Arkansas State Library Archives.
(b) The Arkansas State Library Archives shall collect the orders and
shall periodically obtain from state agencies and departments, and from the
various cities and counties, a sufficient number of copies and documents and
publications to fill the orders.
(c) The Arkansas State Library Archives shall furnish all institutions
of higher learning copies of any documents and publications so ordered
without charge or cost.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 25-18-308 is amended to read as follows:
25-18-308. State and local publications furnished to Arkansas State
Library Archives.
Each department or division of the state, a city, or a county under
whose jurisdiction any printed or processed book, pamphlet, report, or other
publication is issued at the expense of a municipal corporation or of a
county, or of a county and a city, or of the state is directed to furnish
without charge to the Arkansas State Library Archives the number of copies of
such publications as the library Arkansas State Archives may order.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 25-43-502(a)(5), concerning state entities
transferred to the Department of Education, is repealed.
(5) The Arkansas State Library, created under § 13-2-203;

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code § 27-101-108 is amended to read as follows:
27-101-108. Filing and publication of rules.
(a) A copy of the rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter, § 27-101-
201 et seq., § 27-101-301 et seq., § 27-101-501 et seq., § 27-101-601 et
03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163

SB536
seq., and the Arkansas Motorboat Registration and Titling Act, § 27-101-1001
et seq., and of any amendments of those rules shall be filed in the offices
of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the Secretary of State, the
Arkansas State Library Archives, and the Bureau of Legislative Research where
each copy shall be preserved as a public record.
(b) A copy of the rules adopted under § 27-101-401 et seq. and of any
amendments of those rules shall be filed in the offices of the Department of
Health, the Secretary of State, the Arkansas State Library Archives, and the
Bureau of Legislative Research where each copy shall be preserved as a public
record.
(c) Rules under this section shall be published by the responsible
state agency in a convenient form for public use.

SECTION 33. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas State Library
preserves the public peace, health, and safety by providing needed funds and
services for Arkansas; that this act provides for the transfer of the
Arkansas State Library to the Department of Education; and that this act
should become effective on July 1, 2025, to coincide with the appropriation
bills of the Department of Education and ensure that the Arkansas State
Library continues to provide its vital services as the transfer is
implemented and does not experience any issues with funding under the
transfer. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall
become effective on July 1, 2025.











03/20/2025 10:34:08 AM LGL163